District of Columbia statutes.
34-1213

Repealed

Submission of proposed franchise agreement.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 14, 29 DCR 2872
Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 2(s), 30 DCR 4289
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-210, § 2(k), 43 DCR 4702
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1813.